Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 2. Oil and Gas
§ 39-14-208.
Enforcement.

General. The following shall apply:

If the statement provided by W.S. 39-14-207(a)(i) is not filed, the department shall value the crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas production from the best information available. The department may use information other than contained in the statement provided by W.S. 39-14-207(a)(i) to determine the fair market value of the production provided by W.S. 39-14-202(a);

When a taxpayer producing crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas fails to pay the severance taxes when due, the purchaser of the produced crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas shall withhold and remit to the department the taxpayer’s subsequently accruing taxes on the produced crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas acquired by the purchaser. This provision is subject to the following conditions:

The department shall notify the purchaser and taxpayer in writing on or before the first day of the production month for which subsequent taxes are due that the purchaser shall begin remitting taxes to the department as provided in W.S. 39-14-207(b)(iii);

The department shall notify the purchaser in writing of the proper rates for calculating taxes due and the percentage of the produced crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas subject to taxation;

The amount of tax paid by a purchaser to the department, as required by this paragraph, shall offset and satisfy all claims for payments for the purchase of produced crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas to the extent of the tax payment;

This paragraph shall not apply under circumstances where the purchaser is required to continue payments due to legal proceedings;

This paragraph shall not apply until after the purchaser has been notified in writing that subsequent accruing taxes will be payable by the purchaser.

Severance taxes due together with interest, penalties and costs shall be collectible by the department by appropriate judicial proceedings.

Audits. The following shall apply:

The department may employ examiners and obtain other technical services, to investigate and examine the books and records of any person paying ad valorem taxes under W.S.

39-13-101

through

39-13-111

. The department shall notify the county assessor of any change in valuation as determined by audits, examinations or investigations establishing:

Taxable volumes or values were not accurately reported;

Clerical errors were made in determining taxable volumes or values;

Taxable volumes or values for the year that production occurred were not calculated in compliance with Wyoming statutes or rules governing the determinations; or

Additional payment for production was received and not reported whether such payment was received in the year of production or in subsequent years.

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 84, § 102.

The department is authorized to rely on final audit findings, taxpayer amended returns or department review, and to certify mine product valuation amendments to the county assessor of the county from which the crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas was produced, to be entered upon the assessment rolls of the county and taxes computed and collected thereon subject to appeal under W.S. 39-14-209(b)(v), provided that the return is filed within three (3) years from the date the production should have been reported pursuant to W.S. 39-14-207(a)(i), and that the audit or review commenced within the time period as required by paragraph (vii) of this subsection. Commencement of an audit, completion of an audit, and final audit findings and final determination by the department being issued to the taxpayer shall not preclude the taxpayer from filing amended returns within the time period specified herein, and the amended returns may be audited within the time period stated in paragraph (vii) of this subsection;

The department is authorized to rely on final audit findings, taxpayer amended returns or department review, and to assess deficient severance tax payments, interest and penalty, if any, for the same periods governing mine product valuation amendments pursuant to paragraphs (ii) and (iii) of this subsection;

All audits or department reviews, as applicable, pursuant to paragraphs (ii), (iii) and (iv) of this subsection are subject to the following conditions:

Audits are commenced when the taxpayer receives written notice of the intended action;

Prior to entering the premises of a taxpayer or third party, the taxpayer or third party shall be provided at least fourteen (14) days written notice;

Audits are completed when the final findings are issued to the taxpayer by the department of audit;

Unless otherwise agreed to in writing, audits shall be completed and the final audit findings issued to the taxpayer not later than the end of the month two (2) years after the audit is commenced and not sooner than one (1) year following the reporting date for ad valorem taxes;

Any assessment or levy, including the assessment of a penalty and interest, if any, resulting from final audit findings or department review shall be issued within one (1) year following the completion of the audit or review;

Upon receipt of department review findings, the taxpayer shall have sixty (60) days in which to submit a response.

Where there is evidence of gross negligence by the taxpayer in reporting and valuing production, an audit may examine prior years and issue assessments where gross negligence occurred. This subsection shall not apply to mine product valuation amendments to add the value of unreported production;

Audits provided by this article shall commence within three (3) years and six (6) months immediately following the reporting date for ad valorem taxes and taxpayers shall keep accurate books and records of all production subject to severance taxes imposed by this article and determinations of taxable value as prescribed by W.S. 39-14-103(b) for a period of seven (7) years and make them available to department examiners for audit purposes. Amended returns filed with the department during the conduct of an audit prior to the issuance of the final audit findings may be made available by the taxpayer to the audit examiners. If the examination discloses evidence of gross negligence by the taxpayer in reporting and paying the tax, the department may examine all pertinent records for any reporting period without regard to the limitations set forth in paragraphs (vii) and (viii) of this subsection;

In order to examine relevant books or records of a taxpayer subject to severance taxes imposed by this article or to secure any information related to enforcement of this article, authorized representatives of the department may at any time during normal business hours enter premises of a taxpayer liable for a severance tax imposed by this article or the premises of any third party having information regarding that taxpayer’s liability. Prior to entering the premises of a taxpayer or third party, the department shall provide fourteen (14) days written notice to the taxpayer and third party;

The state may employ auditors and obtain other technical assistance necessary to determine if the severance tax imposed by this article has been properly reported and paid;

Audits of mineral production are subject to the authority and procedures set forth in W.S.

9-2-2003

.

Interest. The following shall apply:

The taxpayer is entitled to receive an offsetting credit for any overpaid gross product or severance tax identified by an audit that is within the scope of the audit period, without regard to the limitation period for requesting refunds. In calculating interest regarding severance tax, the department shall first compute a net deficiency amount after subtracting any offsetting credit and then calculate any interest due. In calculating interest regarding ad valorem tax, the county treasurer shall first compute a net deficiency amount after subtracting any offsetting credit and then calculate any interest due. The board of county commissioners shall be bound by any decision made by the department of revenue in the course of an audit conducted under subsection (b) of this section concerning the time period during which interest shall accrue and be due and payable;

Taxes are delinquent pursuant to paragraphs (iii) and (iv) of this subsection when a taxpayer or his agent knew or reasonably should have known that the total tax liability was not paid when due;

Except for any delinquent taxes determined to be due and owing as a result of an audit conducted under subsection (b) of this section, the balance of any ad valorem tax not paid as provided by W.S. 39-14-207(b)(ii) is delinquent after the day on which it is payable and shall bear interest at eighteen percent (18%) per annum. Effective January 15, 2015, for delinquent taxes determined to be due and owing as a result of an audit conducted under subsection (b) of this section, the balance of any ad valorem tax not paid as provided by W.S. 39-14-207(b) shall be delinquent following the day on which it is payable and shall bear interest at the rate set forth in paragraph (iv) of this subsection until paid or collected;

Effective January 1, 2015, interest at an annual rate equal to the average prime interest rate as determined by the state treasurer during the preceding fiscal year plus four percent (4%) shall be added to all delinquent severance taxes and ad valorem taxes determined to be due and owing as a result of an audit conducted under subsection (b) of this section on any mineral produced on or after January 1, 2015. To determine the average prime interest rate, the state treasurer shall average the prime interest rate for at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the thirty (30) largest banks in the United States. The interest rate on delinquent severance and ad valorem taxes shall be adjusted on January 1 of each year following the year in which the taxes first became delinquent. In no instance shall the delinquent tax rate be less than twelve percent (12%) nor greater than eighteen percent (18%) from any mineral produced on or after January 1, 2015. The interest rate on any delinquent crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas severance and ad valorem tax from any crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas produced before January 1, 2015, shall be as provided by the statutes in effect at the time the mineral was produced.

Penalties. The following shall apply:

The taxpayer is entitled to receive an offsetting credit for any overpaid gross product or severance tax identified by an audit that is within the scope of the audit period, without regard to the limitation period for requesting refunds. In calculating penalty, the department shall first compute a net deficiency amount after subtracting any offsetting credit and then calculate any penalty due;

If any person fails to file the ad valorem report required by W.S. 39-14-207(a)(i) by the due date or any extension thereof, the department may impose a penalty equal to a total of one percent (1%) of the taxable value of the production from the well or property but not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) for each calendar month or portion thereof that the report or information is late. If any person fails to file reports and other information required by rule of the department of revenue other than those required by W.S. 39-14-207(a)(v) or 39-14-207(a)(i) the department may impose a penalty of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000.00). The department may waive penalties under this subsection for good cause. Penalties imposed under this subsection may be appealed to the state board of equalization;

If any person fails to make or file a severance tax return and remit the tax as required by W.S. 39-14-207(a)(v) and (b)(iii), the department shall impose a penalty of five percent (5%) of the taxes due for each thirty (30) day period, or fraction thereof, elapsing between the due date of the return and the date filed, unless the person for good cause obtains from the department an extension of time for filing prior to the due date for filing. In no event shall the total penalty imposed by this subsection exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the tax due. The department, for good cause, may waive a penalty imposed for failure to file a return for any one (1) month in a calendar year, provided that:

The return was filed within five (5) business days following the due date, including an approved extension period; and

The taxpayer requests the waiver in writing within fifteen (15) days after the return was filed, setting forth the reasons for the late filing.

If any part of a severance tax deficiency is due to negligence or intentional disregard of rules and regulations, there shall be added a penalty of five percent (5%) of the amount of the deficiency plus interest as provided by W.S. 39-14-208(c)(iv). The taxes, penalty and interest shall be paid by the taxpayer within ten (10) days after receipt of notice and demand by the department;

The department may credit or waive penalties imposed by paragraphs (iii) and (iv) of this subsection as part of a settlement or for any other good cause;

Failure to make severance tax payments at the time they are due and payable under W.S. 39-14-207(a)(iv) and (v) shall subject the taxpayer to enforcement by the oil and gas conservation commission under W.S. 30-5-104(d)(x).

Liens. The following shall apply:

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 50, § 2.

All taxes, fees, penalties and interest imposed under this article are an automatic and continuing lien in favor of the state of Wyoming. The lien is on all property in the state of Wyoming, real, tangible and intangible, including all after acquired property rights, future production and rights to property, of any person severing minerals in this state and who is liable under Wyoming law for the collection, payment or remittance of the severance tax and corresponding penalty or interest as of the date such taxes, fees, penalties or interest is due, and remains a lien until paid;

A lien under this subsection is also a lien on all interests in the mineral estate from which the production was severed, and on all future production of the same mineral from the same leasehold, regardless of any change of ownership or change in the person extracting the mineral;

Any lien arising under this subsection is superior and paramount to all other liens, claims, mortgages or any other encumbrance of any kind except a lien, claim, mortgage or other encumbrance of record held by a bona fide creditor and properly perfected, filed or recorded under Wyoming law prior to the filing of a lien as provided by paragraph (viii) of this subsection;

The department may file a notice of lien at any time at its discretion, except no lien shall be enforced until the right of the taxpayer to file and properly perfect an appeal concerning the tax delinquent property before the state board of equalization has expired. A properly perfected appeal on the tax delinquent property before the state board of equalization or any subsequent properly perfected appeal on the same property to a district court or the supreme court shall stay enforcement of a lien filed by the department until such appeal has been exhausted or concluded;

In order to perfect a tax lien under this subsection, the department of revenue shall file a notice of the tax lien with the secretary of state. The notice of the tax lien shall contain:

The name and last known address of the person or persons against whose property the lien is filed including, but not limited to, the person severing the mineral;

The name and address of the department of revenue as the holder of the lien and the name of the contact person within the department;

The amount of the tax, fees, penalties and interest owed the state of Wyoming;

A statement that the amount of the unpaid tax, fees, penalties or interest is a lien on all property, real, tangible or intangible, including all after acquired property and rights to the property belonging to the person who severed the mineral and located within the state of Wyoming, as well as all interest in the mineral estate from which the production was severed and any future production from the same mineral leasehold.

No other action beyond that described in paragraph (viii) of this subsection shall be required to perfect a tax lien;

The filing of the notice of the tax lien as described in paragraph (viii) of this subsection shall constitute record notice of the tax lien;

One (1) notice of the tax lien shall be deemed sufficient to cover all taxes, together with interest, fees and penalty of the same nature which may accrue after the filing of the notice;

Any tax lien created under this subsection and duly filed with the secretary of state shall survive the death or incapacitation of any person, and shall survive any other destruction or attempted destruction of any interest in property owned by any person liable under Wyoming law for the collection, payment or remittance of taxes, fees, penalties or interest to the state;

In the event of foreclosure, the department of revenue shall be entitled to recover the costs of filing the lien, foreclosing on the lien and reasonable attorney’s fees;

All notice of tax liens shall be released within sixty (60) days after taxes, penalties and interest due are paid or collected;

Notwithstanding that the lien is a lien on all interests in the mineral estate from which the production was severed and on all future production from the same leasehold, the department may for good cause shown, release the lien on all property in this state, real, tangible and intangible, and settle delinquent taxes, interest and penalties to be collected against future production from that leasehold;

The secretary of state is authorized and directed to maintain copies of all tax liens filed by the department of revenue pursuant to this chapter, and to maintain a data base of such tax liens and to provide copies to any person pursuant to the duties of the secretary of state as set forth in W.S.

9-1-301

et seq. All tax liens on file with any county in this state and in good standing on the effective date of this paragraph shall remain effective and in good standing. Within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this paragraph, the director of the department of revenue shall transmit to the secretary of state for filing copies of all tax liens that the director seeks to have in continuing effect. Upon the filing of a copy of the tax lien with the secretary of state, the tax lien shall continue to be fully effective until released by the department of revenue.

Tax sales. There are no specific applicable provisions for tax sales for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2001, ch. 43, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 49, § 1; ch. 50, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 4, § 1; 2009, ch. 150, § 1; 2012, ch. 84, § 102; 2014 ch. 68, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2016 ch. 16, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, made changes in the auditing period, adding the last sentence in (b)(iii); adding “and not sooner than one (1) year following the reporting date for ad valorem taxes” in (b)(v)(D); and in (b)(vii) substituting “date for ad valorem taxes” for “period,” and adding the second sentence; and making stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment,

in (b)(iii), in the first sentence, deleted “or was” following “should have been” and deleted “whichever is later” preceding “and that the audit.”

Laws 2009, ch. 150, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.
Approved March 5, 2009.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, repealed former (b)(ii), which read: “Effective until March 1, 1994, the department is authorized to rely on final audit findings under W.S.

9-2-2003

, taxpayer amended returns or department review, and to certify mine product valuation amendments for production in calendar year 1985 and thereafter, to the county assessor of the county from which the crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas was produced to be entered upon the assessment rolls of the county and taxes computed and collected thereon subject to appeal under W.S. 39-14-209(b)(v).”

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (b)(viii), deleted the former third sentence; in (c)(i), substituted “interest regarding severance tax, the department shall” for interest, the department or board of county commissioners shall” and added the third and fourth sentences; rewrote (c)(iii); and in (c)(iv), substituted “January 1, 2015” for “January 1, 1994” in four places, inserted “and ad valorem taxes determined to be due and owing as a result of an audit conducted under subsection (b) of this section” following “severance taxes” in the first sentence, “severance and ad valorem” following “on delinquent” in the third sentence, inserted “and ad valorem” following “gas severance” and substituted “as provided by the statutes in effect at the time the mineral was produced” for “eighteen percent (18%) per annum” in the fifth sentence.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, deleted “Commencing January 1, 2003” and made related changes in (b)(iii).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (d)(vi).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 50, § 3, provides that the lien created by the act is an equitable remedy created on behalf and in favor of the state and that it is available to the state in the collection of taxes, fees, penalties and interest.

Determination of taxable value. —

This section clearly authorizes the Wyoming Department of Revenue to go beyond simply the numbers reported and payments received for production to independently determine if the taxable value was calculated in compliance with applicable Wyoming statutes and rules. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue v. Guthrie, 2005 WY 79, 115 P.3d 1086,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2005).

All production within state to be considered. —

Board of equalization was required to consider all of taxpayer's production within the state in order to determine whether a penalty was warranted. Amoco Prod. Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 12 P.3d 668,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2000).

Untimely appeal. —

Board of Equalization properly dismissed an energy company's appeal as being untimely because the 2008 assessment letters were final administrative decisions; the company first had notice of the volumetric discrepancies from the sixty-day notice letters sent by the Department of Revenue set forth that the assessment of additional taxable value had an appeal time of thirty days, and the company did nothing until all appeal options were expired. Merit Energy Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2013 WY 145, 313 P.3d 1257,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2013).

Applied

in

Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Exxon Mobil Corp. 2002 WY 151, 55 P.3d 714,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

BP America Prod. Co. v. Department of Revenue, 2006 WY 27, 130 P.3d 438,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. Mar. 14, 2006).

§ 39-14-209.
Taxpayer remedies.

Interpretation requests. The following shall apply:

The taxpayer may request a value determination from the department and propose a value determination method which may be used until the department issues a value determination. The taxpayer shall submit all available data relevant to its proposal and any additional information the department deems necessary. After the department issues its determination, the taxpayer shall make adjustments based upon the value established or request a hearing by the board;

A taxpayer may request and the department shall provide written interpretations of these statutes and rules. When requesting an interpretation, a taxpayer must set forth the facts and circumstances pertinent to the issue. If the department deems the facts and circumstances provided to be insufficient, it may request additional information. A taxpayer may act in reliance upon a written interpretation through the end of the calendar year in which the interpretation was issued, or until revoked by the department, whichever occurs last if the pertinent facts and circumstances were substantially correct and fully disclosed.

Appeals. The following shall apply:

Any person aggrieved by any final administrative decision of the department may appeal to the state board of equalization. Appeals shall be made in a timely manner as provided by rules and regulations of the board by filing with the board a notice of appeal specifying the grounds therefor. The department shall, within a timely manner as specified by board rules and regulations, transmit to the board the complete record of the action from which the appeal is taken;

Any interested person adversely affected by the adoption, amendment or repeal of a rule pursuant to W.S. 16-3-103(a) shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing before the state board of equalization;

Any person including the state of Wyoming aggrieved by any order issued by the state board of equalization, or any county board of equalization whose decision has been reversed or modified by the state board of equalization, may appeal the decision of the board to the district court of the county in which the production or some part thereof is situated;

Following determination of the fair market value of crude oil, lease condensate or natural gas production the department shall notify the taxpayer by mail of the assessed value. The person assessed may file written objections to the assessment with the state board of equalization within thirty (30) days of the date of postmark and appear before the board at a time specified by the board. The person assessed shall also file a copy of the written objections with the county treasurer of the county in which the production is located, who shall notify the county assessor and the board of county commissioners, with an estimate of the tax amount under appeal based upon the previous year’s tax levy;

Mine product valuation amendments may be appealed by the taxpayer to the state board of equalization within thirty (30) days of the final administrative decision;

Any taxpayer who feels aggrieved by the valuation and severance taxes levied by this article may appeal to the state board of equalization. The appeal does not relieve the taxpayer from paying the tax when due and payable nor does the payment invalidate the appeal. No restraining order or injunction shall be granted or issued by any court or judge to restrain or enjoin the collection of any severance tax, interest or penalty imposed by this article.

Refunds. The following shall apply:

If a taxpayer has reason to believe that ad valorem taxes imposed by this article have been overpaid, a request for refund shall be filed with the department by submitting amended returns within three (3) years from the date the production should have been reported pursuant to W.S. 39-14-207(a)(i). Any refund granted shall be subject to modification or revocation upon audit;

If a taxpayer has reason to believe that severance taxes imposed by this article have been overpaid, a request for refund shall be filed with the department by submitting an amended return within three (3) years from the date the production should have been reported pursuant to W.S. 39-14-207(a)(i). Refunds of two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or less may be applied to subsequent payments for severance taxes imposed by this article. Requests for refunds exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) shall be approved in writing by the department prior to the taxpayer receiving credit. All refunds granted are subject to modification or revocation upon audit;

Notwithstanding paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection, the taxpayer is entitled to receive a refund of any overpaid ad valorem or severance tax identified by an audit regardless of whether a refund has been requested.

Credits. The following shall apply:

Any ad valorem tax refund may, at the discretion of the board of county commissioners, be made in the form of credit against future tax payments for a period not to exceed five (5) years. Unless otherwise agreed to by the taxpayer, refunds in the form of credit against future tax payments shall be made in no less than equal annual amounts. The board of county commissioners shall not provide a credit for interest on the excess tax paid unless the taxes are paid under protest due to an appeal pending before the state board of equalization and the taxpayer prevails in the appeal;

If a taxpayer overpaid severance taxes imposed by this article, the department shall allow a credit in the amount of the overpayment to be taken on the taxpayer’s subsequent monthly reports for the production year;

The taxpayer is entitled to receive an offsetting credit for any overpaid ad valorem or severance tax identified by an audit that is within the scope of the audit without regard to the limitation period for requesting refunds.

Redemption. There are no specific applicable provisions for redemption for this article.

Escrow. The following shall apply:

If ad valorem taxes are paid under protest to the extent of and due to an appeal pending before the state board of equalization or any court of competent jurisdiction, the county treasurer shall deposit that protested amount under appeal in an interest bearing escrow account and withhold distribution until a final decision on the appeal has been rendered. To the extent the taxpayer prevails in the appeal, the county treasurer shall refund that amount under appeal, plus interest earned thereon, to the taxpayer within thirty (30) days from the day the final decision is rendered. If the taxpayer pays to the county an amount in excess of the protested amount under appeal, the excess shall be distributed as provided by law;

If severance taxes are paid under protest to the extent of and due to an appeal pending before the state board of equalization or any court of competent jurisdiction, the department shall deposit that protested amount under appeal in a separate interest bearing escrow account and withhold distribution until a final decision on the appeal has been rendered by the state board of equalization or the court. To the extent the taxpayer prevails in the appeal, the department shall refund that amount under appeal, plus interest earned thereon, to the taxpayer within thirty (30) days from the day the final decision is rendered. If the taxpayer pays to the state an amount in excess of the protested amount under appeal, the excess shall be distributed as provided by law;

The provisions of paragraph (ii) of this subsection do not enlarge or curtail the ability of a taxpayer to appeal any department of revenue decision as otherwise provided for under this act.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 2009, ch. 150, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2009 amendment

rewrote (c)(i), which read: “If any person pays any ad valorem tax, or portion thereof, found to have been erroneous or illegal, the board of county commissioners shall direct the county treasurer to refund the erroneous or illegal payment to the taxpayer.
When an increase in the value of any product is subject to the approval of any agency of the United States of America or the state of Wyoming, or of any court, the increased value shall be subject to ad valorem taxation.
In the event the increase in value is disapproved, either in whole or in part, then the amount of tax which has been paid on the disapproved part of the value shall be considered excess tax.
Within one (1) year following the final determination of value, any person who has paid any such excess tax may apply for a refund, and the board of county commissioners shall refund the amount of excess tax paid”; substituted “by submitting an amended return within three (3) years from the date the production should have been reported pursuant to W.S. 39-14-207(a)(i)” for “on forms it prescribes prior to the end of the fifth calendar year following the calendar year which included the month for which overpayment was made” in the first sentence of (c)(ii); added (c)(iii) and made a related change; and deleted “period” following “scope of the audit” in (d)(ii).

Laws 2009, ch. 150, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.
Approved March 5, 2009.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (f)(ii), substituted “department” for “state treasurer” twice.

Untimely appeal. —

Board of Equalization properly dismissed an energy company's appeal as being untimely because the 2008 assessment letters were final administrative decisions; the company first had notice of the volumetric discrepancies from the sixty-day notice letters sent by the Department of Revenue set forth that the assessment of additional taxable value had an appeal time of thirty days, and the company did nothing until all appeal options were expired. Merit Energy Co. v. Dep't of Revenue, 2013 WY 145, 313 P.3d 1257,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2013).

Amounts paid under protest. —

Proper determination of amount of taxes paid under protest was the difference between taxpayer's objective calculation of its tax obligation and the tax which was levied, and amount was not controlled by county treasurer's previous estimate. Basin Elec. Power Coop. v. Bowen, 979 P.2d 503,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1999) (decided under prior law).

Applied

in

Bd. of County Comm'rs v. Exxon Mobil Corp. 2002 WY 151, 55 P.3d 714,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Wyodak Res. Dev. Corp. v. Wyo. Dep't of Revenue, 2002 WY 181, 60 P.3d 129,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 217

(Wyo. 2002).

§ 39-14-210.
Statute of limitations.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, there is no general statute of limitations for this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-14-211.
Distribution.

The state treasurer shall transfer the revenue collected from the severance tax imposed by W.S. 39-14-204(a)(i) into the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund. The state treasurer shall transfer the revenue collected from the severance tax imposed by W.S. 39-14-204(a)(ii), (iii) and (iv) into the severance tax distribution account.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 62, § 2.

Revenues to be distributed to local governments under W.S.

39-14-801

shall be distributed as follows:

Distributions shall be made quarterly in an amount equal to one-fourth (1/4) of the amount estimated to be earned in the current fiscal year based upon the most recent consensus revenue estimating group estimates. In computing distributions, the state treasurer shall make adjustments to reflect changes in the consensus revenue estimating group estimates;

Not later than September 15, the state treasurer shall compute actual earnings for the months of the preceding fiscal year for which estimates were used in computing distributions. The state treasurer shall make adjustments to distributions during the current fiscal year in an amount equal to the difference between revenues earned and actual distributions for the preceding fiscal year.

through (g) Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 209, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 2; ch. 62, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 62, § 2.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; ch. 108, § 2; 1999, ch. 121, § 1; 2000, ch. 58, § 1; ch. 97, §§ 2(b), 3, and 4; ch. 99, § 1; 2001, ch. 209, §§ 2(b), 3; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 45, § 2; ch. 62, §§ 1, 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Purpose of act. —

Laws 2000, ch. 58, § 2, provides that the purpose of the act is to increase the investment returns available to the state.